Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.040

Bylaws for board and school government.

Every board of directors shall have power to make such bylaws for their own government, and the government of the common schools under their charge, as they deem expedient, not inconsistent with the provisions of this title, or rules and regulations of the superintendent of public instruction or the state board of education.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.110. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 287 s 6; RRS s 4781; prior: 1897 c 118 s 43; 1890 p 366 s 29. Formerly RCW 28A.58.110, 28.58.110.]